Nevada, session 83, AB296.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 481.055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
481.055 1. The Department shall keep its main office at
Carson City, Nevada, in rooms provided by the Buildings and
Grounds Section of the State Public Works Division of the
Department of Administration.
2. The Department may maintain such branch offices
throughout the State as the Director may deem necessary to the
efficient operation of the Department and the various divisions
thereof in space provided by the Buildings and Grounds Section.
Any leases or agreements entered into pursuant to this subsection
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
must be executed in accordance with the provisions of
NRS 331.110.
3. The Department may establish an electronic branch office
consisting of an Internet website or software application through
which, notwithstanding any specific statute to the contrary, a person
may submit forms, applications and other documentation and the
Department may conduct transactions that have been designated by
the Director as suitable to be conducted through electronic means,
including, without limitation:
(a) The electronic transmission, recording and issuance of
certificates of title, certificates of registration and information
relating to those certificates.
(b) The electronic transmission and recording of applications for
driver’s licenses.
(c) The recording and electronic transmission between the
Department, other states and law enforcement of information
relating to citations and crashes, collisions, accidents and other
casualties.
(d) The acceptance of electronic signatures.
(e) The collection and exchange of applications for licenses and
other information from persons who are licensed as or seeking to be
licensed as:
(1) Brokers;
(2) Dealers;
(3) Distributors;
(4) Lessors;
(5) Manufacturers;
(6) Rebuilders;
(7) Salespersons; and
(8) Vehicle transporters.
(f) The issuance of registration credentials pursuant to
NRS 482.217.
4. The Department shall not conduct a transaction through the
electronic branch office which state or federal law specifically
requires to be conducted in person or accept documentation through
the electronic branch office which state or federal law specifically
requires to be presented in original form.
5. If the Department provides the ability to register or renew
the registration of vehicles through an electronic branch office
consisting of an Internet website or software application, the
Department shall contract with a person who is licensed pursuant
to chapter 675 of NRS to allow the person to offer, through the
website or application, installment loans to vehicle owners to pay
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
the applicable fees and taxes due for the initial or renewal
registration of a vehicle, including, without limitation,
governmental services taxes, sales and use taxes due pursuant to
NRS 482.225, fees for license plates and registration fees. The
person with whom the Department contracts pursuant to this
subsection:
(a) Must furnish to the Department, at the time of the initial or
renewal registration of a vehicle, the entire amount of the fees and
taxes owed by the vehicle owner to whom an installment loan is
provided;
(b) Shall not charge the vehicle owner an annual percentage
rate with respect to the loan;
(c) Shall not charge the vehicle owner any fee or combination
of fees for the installment loan in excess of 15 percent of the total
amount financed;
(d) May only provide a loan pursuant to this subsection if the
total amount financed is $250 or more; and
(e) Shall not rollover or refinance any installment loan
provided pursuant to this subsection into any other loan made to
the vehicle owner pursuant to chapter 604A or 675 of NRS.
Sec. 2. Chapter 482 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Director may authorize the use of digital license plates
in accordance with this section upon application by a person who
otherwise complies with the requirements for registration and
licensing pursuant to this chapter.
2. The use of a digital license plate must be voluntary and the
Department shall not require any person to use or install a digital
license plate or digital license plate device.
3. All digital license plates authorized for use pursuant to this
section must:
(a) Display the license plate code assigned to the vehicle by the
Department and evidence of valid registration at all times,
including, without limitation, when the vehicle is in motion,
stationary, parked or unoccupied.
(b) Be plainly readable by the human eye from a distance of
100 feet during daylight and darkness.
(c) Be displayed on a digital license plate device that has been
approved by the Department and purchased from a vendor
approved by the Department.
(d) Display only information and images required or
authorized for display by the Department.
4. The Department may:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(a) Approve alternative banner messages to appear on the
bottom of a digital license plate.
(b) Authorize the sale or resale of digital license plate devices
by a device manufacturer or by participating vendors, subject to
review and approval by the Department.
(c) By regulation, restrict the types or classes of vehicles for
which the Department will authorize the use of a digital license
plate.
5. The Department may authorize digital license plates to
replicate the appearance of a license plate type other than a
standard license plate. If the Department authorizes a digital
license plate to replicate the appearance of a special license plate,
the Department shall charge for the use or renewal of a digital
license plate which replicates the appearance of a special license
plate the same fees which are charged for the conventional version
of the special license plate. Any such fee which is imposed to
generate financial support for a particular cause or charitable
organization must be deposited and distributed in the same
manner as the fee imposed with respect to the conventional
version of the special license plate. A digital license plate which
replicates the appearance of a special license plate is valid for the
same length of time as the conventional version of the special
license plate. The Department may cease the use of digital license
plates which replicate the appearance of a special license plate
which the Department no longer issues in conventional form. If
the owner of a vehicle does not renew the digital license plate
which replicates the appearance of a special license plate or the
Department has ceased the use of the digital license plate which
replicates the appearance of a special license plate previously used
by the owner of a vehicle, the owner of a vehicle may continue to
use a digital license plate which does not replicate the appearance
of the special license plate.
6. The Department may authorize a digital license plate to
replicate the appearance of a personalized prestige license plate
issued pursuant to NRS 482.3667 by displaying a personalized
license plate code. The Department shall charge for the use of a
digital license plate that replicates the appearance of a
personalized prestige license plate the same fees which are
charged for the issuance and renewal of a conventional
personalized license plate. A digital license plate which replicates
the appearance of a personalized prestige license plate is valid for
the same length of time as a conventional personalized prestige
license plate as provided in NRS 482.3667. Any fees collected
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
pursuant to this subsection must be deposited with the State
Treasurer to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Fund. The provisions
of subsections 5, 6 and 7 of NRS 482.3667 apply with equal force
to a digital license plate which replicates the appearance of a
personalized prestige license plate.
7. The Department shall not charge any fee for the use of a
digital license plate or digital license plate device in excess of the
fees charged for a conventional license plate of the same type.
8. The Department shall adopt regulations:
(a) Prescribing standards for the personally identifiable
information which may be stored on a digital license plate or
digital license plate device, which must be limited to that
information which is deemed necessary by the Department to
display evidence of registration compliance or for the
manufacturer or vendor to provide services to the owner of a
digital license plate device.
(b) Prescribing standards governing the use of digital license
plates and digital license plate devices, including, without
limitation:
(1) Protocols for data sharing, privacy and security.
(2) Information which must be displayed on a digital
license plate.
(3) Information and images which may be displayed on a
digital license plate, which may include, if determined by the
Department to be appropriate and not contrary to the interests of
the public, emergency service alerts and personalized messages.
(4) The list of digital license plate devices which are
approved for use pursuant to this section.
(5) The procedure through which a person may apply to
use a digital license plate.
9. All provisions of this title relating to license plates apply to
digital license plates and digital license plate devices except:
(a) As otherwise specifically provided;
(b) As to those provisions which, owing to the physical
differences between digital license plates or digital license plate
devices and conventional license plates, can have no application;
(c) Provisions requiring the return or surrender of license
plates to the Department do not require the return or surrender of
a digital license plate device which was not purchased from the
Department; and
(d) The provisions of NRS 482.270 do not apply to a digital
license plate or digital license plate device.
10. As used in this section:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(a) “Digital license plate” means a digital image displayed on
a digital license plate device that includes the license plate code
assigned to the vehicle and any other information or images which
the Department may authorize or require by regulation.
(b) “Digital license plate device” means an electronic device
capable of:
(1) Being mounted to a motor vehicle in accordance with
the requirements for motor vehicle license plates; and
(2) Displaying a digital license plate.
(c) “License plate code” means the unique combination of
numbers, letters or both numbers and letters appearing on the face
of a license plate.
(d) “Special license plate” means a special license plate issued
pursuant to NRS 482.3667 to 482.3823, inclusive.
Sec. 3. NRS 482.265 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.265 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection
5, the Department shall furnish to every owner whose vehicle is
registered two license plates for a motor vehicle other than a
motorcycle or moped and one license plate for all other vehicles
required to be registered hereunder. Except as otherwise provided in
NRS 482.2085 and 482.2155, or unless unnecessary because a
digital license plate has been authorized for use on the vehicle,
upon renewal of registration, the Department may issue one or more
license plate stickers, tabs or other suitable devices in lieu of new
license plates.
2. The Director shall have the authority to require the return to
the Department of all number plates upon termination of the lawful
use thereof by the owner under this chapter.
3. Except as otherwise specifically provided by statute, for the
issuance of each special license plate authorized pursuant to this
chapter:
(a) The fee to be received by the Department for the initial
issuance of the special license plate is $35, exclusive of any
additional fee which may be added to generate funds for a particular
cause or charitable organization;
(b) The fee to be received by the Department for the renewal of
the special license plate is $10, exclusive of any additional fee
which may be added to generate financial support for a particular
cause or charitable organization; and
(c) The Department shall not design, prepare or issue a special
license plate unless, within 4 years after the date on which the
measure authorizing the issuance becomes effective, it receives at
least 250 applications for the issuance of that plate.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
4. The provisions of subsection 3 do not apply to
NRS 482.37901.
5. If, at the time of registration, the owner of a vehicle applies
to use a digital license plate on the vehicle pursuant to section 2 of
this act, the Department is not required to furnish a license plate
to the vehicle owner pursuant to subsection 1. If the owner of a
vehicle applies to use a digital license plate on a vehicle for which
a license plate was previously issued by the Department, the
Department may require the return to the Department of the
license plate or plates previously issued for the vehicle.
Sec. 4. NRS 482.267 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.267 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 [,]
and section 2 of this act, the Director shall utilize the facility for the
production of license plates which is located at the Department of
Corrections to produce all license plates required by the Department
of Motor Vehicles.
2. The Director may contract with a vendor for the production
of license plates which require technological or mechanical
processes which are not available at the facility.
Sec. 5. NRS 482.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.275 1. The license plates for a motor vehicle other than a
motorcycle, moped or motor vehicle being transported by a licensed
vehicle transporter must be attached thereto, one in the rear and,
except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 [,] or 3, one in the
front. The license plate issued for all other vehicles required to be
registered must be attached to the rear of the vehicle. The license
plates must be so displayed during the current calendar year or
registration period.
2. If the motor vehicle was not manufactured to include a
bracket, device or other contrivance to display and secure a front
license plate, and if the manufacturer of the motor vehicle provided
no other means or method by which a front license plate may be
displayed upon and secured to the motor vehicle:
(a) One license plate must be attached to the motor vehicle in
the rear; and
(b) The other license plate may, at the option of the owner of the
vehicle, be attached to the motor vehicle in the front.
3. If a digital license plate has been authorized for use on a
motor vehicle pursuant to section 2 of this act:
(a) The digital license plate device must be attached to the
motor vehicle in the rear; and
(b) No license plate is required to be attached to the motor
vehicle in the front.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
4. The provisions of subsection 2 do not relieve the
Department of the duty to issue a set of two license plates as
otherwise required pursuant to NRS 482.265 or other applicable law
and do not entitle the owner of a motor vehicle to pay a reduced tax
or fee in connection with the registration or transfer of the motor
vehicle. If the owner of a motor vehicle, in accordance with the
provisions of subsection 2, exercises the option to attach a license
plate only to the rear of the motor vehicle, the owner shall:
(a) Retain the other license plate; and
(b) Insofar as it may be practicable, return or surrender both
plates to the Department as a set when required by law to do so.
[4.] 5. Every license plate , including a digital license plate
device, must at all times be securely fastened to the vehicle to which
it is assigned so as to prevent the plate from swinging and at a
height not less than 12 inches from the ground, measuring from the
bottom of such plate, in a place and position to be clearly visible,
and must be maintained free from foreign materials and in a
condition to be clearly legible.
[5.] 6. Any license plate which is issued to a vehicle
transporter or a dealer, rebuilder or manufacturer may be attached to
a vehicle owned or controlled by that person by a secure means. No
license plate may be displayed loosely in the window or by any
other unsecured method in any motor vehicle.
Sec. 5.3. NRS 675.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
675.090 1. Application for a license must be in writing, under
oath, and in the form prescribed by the Commissioner.
2. The application must:
(a) Provide the address of the office or other place of business
for which the application is submitted.
(b) Contain such further relevant information as the
Commissioner may require, including the names and addresses of
the partners, officers, directors or trustees, and of such of the
principal owners or members as will provide the basis for the
investigations and findings contemplated by NRS 675.110 and
675.120.
3. A person may apply for a license for an office or other place
of business located outside this State from which the applicant will
conduct business in this State if:
(a) The applicant is an Internet business lender [;] , including,
without limitation, a person who has contracted with the
Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to subsection 5 of
NRS 481.055 to make loans through an electronic branch office of
the Department; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
(b) The applicant or a subsidiary or affiliate of the applicant has
a license issued pursuant to this chapter for an office or other place
of business located in this State.
4. A person who wishes to apply for a license pursuant to
subsection 3 must submit with the application for a license a
statement signed by the applicant which states that the applicant
agrees to:
(a) Make available at a location within this State the books,
accounts, papers, records and files of the office or place of business
located outside this State to the Commissioner or a representative of
the Commissioner; or
(b) Pay the reasonable expenses for travel, meals and lodging of
the Commissioner or a representative of the Commissioner incurred
during any investigation or examination made at the office or place
of business located outside this State.
 The person must be allowed to choose between paragraph (a) or
(b) in complying with the provisions of this subsection.
5. The Commissioner shall consider an application to be
withdrawn if the Commissioner has not received all information and
fees required to complete the application within 6 months after the
date the application is first submitted to the Commissioner or within
such later period as the Commissioner determines in accordance
with any existing policies of joint regulatory partners. If an
application is deemed to be withdrawn pursuant to this subsection or
if an applicant otherwise withdraws an application, the
Commissioner may not issue a license to the applicant unless the
applicant submits a new application and pays any required fees.
Sec. 5.7. NRS 675.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
675.230 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
3, a licensee may not conduct the business of making loans under
this chapter within any office, suite, room or place of business in
which any other business is solicited or engaged in, except an
insurance agency or notary public, or in association or conjunction
with any other business, unless authority to do so is given by the
Commissioner.
2. A licensee may conduct the business of making loans
pursuant to this chapter in the same office or place of business as a
mortgage company if:
(a) The licensee and the mortgage company:
(1) Operate as separate legal entities;
(2) Maintain separate accounts, books and records;
(3) Are subsidiaries of the same parent corporation; and
(4) Maintain separate licenses; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(b) The mortgage company is licensed by this state pursuant to
chapter 645B of NRS and does not receive money to acquire or
repay loans or maintain trust accounts as provided by
NRS 645B.175.
3. A licensee who is an Internet business lender , including,
without limitation, a person who has contracted with the
Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to subsection 5 of NRS
481.055 to make loans through an electronic branch office of the
Department, may conduct the business of making loans pursuant to
this chapter within any office, suite, room or place of business in
which any other business is solicited or engaged in.
Sec. 6. Section 7 of chapter 498, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at
page 3006, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 7. 1. This section and section 6.5 of this act
become effective on July 1, 2019.
2. Sections 1 to 6, inclusive, of this act become effective
on October 1, 2019, and expire by limitation on
December 31, [2026.] 2030.
Sec. 6.5. As soon as practicable, upon determining that
sufficient resources are available to enable the Department of Motor
Vehicles to carry out the amendatory provisions of section 1 of this
act, the Director of the Department shall notify the Governor and the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau of that fact, and shall
publish on the Internet website of the Department notice to the
public of that fact.
Sec. 7. 1. This section and sections 6 and 6.5 of this act
become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective on the date on which
the Director of the Department of Motor Vehicles, pursuant to
section 6.5 of this act, notifies the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau that sufficient resources are available to
carry out the amendatory provisions of this act.
3. Sections 2 to 5.7, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)